Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1,115
Sections; applicability.

Sections 45-1,112 to 45-1,115 shall apply to credit agreements entered into on or after July 10, 1990.

Laws 1989, LB 606, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 1199, § 4.